Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2418
Waterworks project, defined.

Waterworks project shall mean any plant, works, system, facilities, and real and personal property of any nature whatsoever, together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, or any interest therein or right to capacity thereof, used or useful in the supplying, transporting, conveying, collection, distribution, storing, purification, or treatment of water.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 18.